Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Intrastate Bridges and Ferries Connecting With State Primary Road System

280.010.
Definitions for KRS 280.020 to 280.130.

As used in KRS

280.020

to

280.130

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Department of Highways.

“Bridge company” or “ferry company” means any person owning, controlling, operating or managing any toll bridge or toll ferry.

“Toll bridge” or “toll ferry” means any bridge or ferry located or operated entirely within this state that is operated over or connects with any highway embraced in the state primary road system and is used in the business of transporting persons for compensation over any stream in this state.

History.

4356za-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

County and city bridges, tunnels and ferries, KRS Ch. 181.

Ferry service, when railroad may operate, KRS

277.090

.

Franchises subject to revocation, alteration or amendment, Const., § 3.

Local or special legislation concerning licensing of companies to own or operate ferries or affecting toll gates prohibited, Const., § 59 (17).

State bridges, tunnels and ferries, KRS Ch. 180.

Taxation of bridge and ferry companies, KRS Ch. 136.

280.020.
Certificate of convenience and necessity required to operate toll bridge or ferry connecting with state primary road system.

No person shall operate a toll bridge or toll ferry without first having obtained from the Department of Highways a certificate declaring that public convenience and necessity require such operation, except such toll bridge companies and toll ferry companies as hold perpetual and irrevocable franchises for such operation, and such companies shall be subject to all of the other provisions of KRS

280.010

to

280.110

.

History.

4356za-4.

280.030.
Application for certificate — When granted.

Every person applying for a certificate of convenience and necessity under KRS

280.020

shall, at the time of application, make and file with the Department of Highways a statement in a form as the department prescribes.

The statement shall, in addition to any other information required by the department, contain:

The name of the applicant;

The nature of the applicant, whether an individual, association, or corporation, and under the laws of what state organized;

The location of its principal office;

The names and post office addresses of its president, secretary, auditor, treasurer, and superintendent or manager;

The name and post office address of its chief officer or managing agent in this state;

The location of the termini between which it transacts its ferry or bridge business;

The number and capacity of boats or other vehicles owned and used for the ferry or the width of driveway of the bridge;

The schedule of hours of service and trips made; and

The schedule showing the rates to be charged and the classification of patrons by rates.

The statement shall be made under the oath of the applicant or, if the applicant is an association or corporation, under the oath of its president, secretary, treasurer, superintendent or manager.

The department shall, after the filing of the application, fix a date for a public hearing on the application, which shall be within thirty (30) days after the filing. The applicant shall give notice of the filing of the application by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424.

If it is made to appear to the department that public convenience and necessity requires the operation of the bridge or ferry, the department shall grant the certificate. Any person aggrieved by the decision of the department may appeal, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4356za-3, 4356za-7 to 4356za-9: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 198; 1996, ch. 318, § 190, effective July 15, 1996.

280.040.
Operations to comply with certificate, rules of department and statutes.

Except as otherwise expressly provided by law, and except in case of emergency due to the act of God or unavoidable accident, or in case it becomes necessary to make temporary detours, no bridge company or ferry company shall operate in this state over any bridge or stream other than that provided for in its certificate of convenience and necessity, or fail to operate thereon in the manner and at the time specified in the certificate.

Each such company shall comply with every rule, regulation and order of the Department of Highways until it has been modified or set aside by the department, or has been modified or set aside by final order of a court upon appeal as provided in KRS

280.110

. Each such company shall comply with all statutes of this state applying to bridges or ferries.

History.

4356za-3, 4356za-10.

280.050.
Fees paid by bridge and ferry companies.
[Repealed.]

280.060.
Annual report.

Each bridge or ferry company holding a certificate of convenience and necessity shall, on or before March 1 of each year, make and file with the Department of Highways a statement under oath in the same form and containing the same kind of information as provided in KRS

280.030

.

History.

4356za-7, 4356za-8.

280.070.
Report of accidents — Interruptions to service.

Each bridge company and each ferry company shall immediately notify the Department of Highways in writing of all accidents resulting in loss of life or serious injury.

Whenever, by reason of accident, disability or breakdown, operation of the ferry or bridge pursuant to the schedule filed with the department and in compliance with the conditions prescribed by law is impossible, the company shall make available a substitute way to take the place of the bridge or ferry in order that the schedule may be maintained.

Whenever an interruption to the regular service of a bridge or ferry has continued or is likely to continue over a period of more than twenty-four (24) hours, the company shall notify the Department of Highways, in writing or by telephone or telegraph, of the character, cause and probable duration of the interruption, and of the arrangements made or being made for making available a substitute crossing.

History.

4356za-11, 4356za-12.

280.080.
Department of Highways to enforce law — Power to regulate rates and service and require reports.

The Department of Highways shall take all steps necessary to carry into effect the provisions of KRS

280.010

to

280.110

, and shall have printed all blanks, rules and directions necessary to enforce its rules and regulations.

The department shall supervise and regulate every bridge company and ferry company, and shall fix such classifications and make such rules and regulations for the control of such companies as it deems necessary. It shall regulate the rates of toll to be charged, and the services, hours of service and safety of operations of each such company. It shall require the filing of reports and any other data of such companies as to all matters affecting their relationship with the traveling public.

History.

4356za-3, 4356za-16.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Tolls for farm trucks to be same as for passenger cars, KRS

180.095

.

280.090.
Inspection of bridges and ferries.

Representatives of the Department of Highways may, at any time and place, enter into or upon any toll bridge or toll ferry for the purpose of ascertaining whether any of the provisions of KRS

280.010

to

280.110

or any of the rules and regulations of the department have been violated. If the operator of such a toll bridge or toll ferry willfully refuses to permit a representative of the department to enter into or upon the bridge or ferry or to furnish him any information as to rates charged, schedules observed or regulations obeyed, the refusal shall be sufficient ground for the revocation or suspension of his certificate of convenience and necessity.

History.

4356za-13.

280.100.
Suspension or revocation of certificate — When department to operate bridge or ferry.

If, after a hearing conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B, the Department of Highways finds that a bridge company or a ferry company has, without good cause, violated or refused to observe any order or administrative regulation of the department, the department may, by final order duly entered, suspend, revoke, alter, or amend the certificate of convenience and necessity held by the company. If, after notice and hearing as provided in this section, the department finds that the company has failed to comply with any of the provisions of KRS

280.010

to

280.110

, the department shall revoke the certificate. If the certificate is revoked, the department shall take over the operation of the bridge or ferry.

In any of the cases mentioned in subsection (1) of this section, the company may proceed under the provisions of KRS

280.110

to determine its rights.

History.

4356za-3, 4356za-15: amend. Acts 1996, ch. 318, § 191, effective July 15, 1996.

280.110.
Hearings — Appeals.

In all matters in which the Department of Highways has power and authority under KRS

280.010

to

280.100

, it may hear applications and complaints, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, require persons to testify under oath, administer oaths, and issue process, orders, opinions and decisions, but from each final order of the department an appeal may be taken to the Franklin Circuit Court as provided in KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

4356za: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. IV, § 20(1); 1976, ch. 62, § 134; 1996, ch. 318, § 192, effective July 15, 1996.

280.120.
Warning signs and lights on roads approaching ferry.

Each ferry company shall at all times during daylight maintain warning signs of adequate size at distances of five hundred (500) feet and one hundred (100) feet from each bank of the river, and during all hours other than daylight shall maintain red warning lights at the same distances from each bank.

History.

4356za-20.

280.130.
Mooring of ferry boats — Docks — Aprons.

Each ferry company shall, where it is practicable, maintain at all times at each landing a dock, durably constructed and of sufficient size to accommodate two 2 1/2-ton trucks or two 7-passenger automobiles. The dock shall be securely moored to the shore and shall be provided with iron bars or pipes securely fastened to strong, upright, well-braced posts, the bars or pipes to be kept in place at all times except when the boat is secured to the dock. The construction of the dock, mooring, bars and fastenings shall be strong enough to resist the impact of cars or trucks under reasonable circumstances. Ferry boats using aprons, where it is not practicable to use docks, shall be moored to 3/4-inch iron rings secured to rods of iron of the same size, with splay foot and imbedded in 8-inch concrete roadway. The boat shall have a chain of Swedish iron of 5/8-inch size securely bolted to each gunwale, and the boat shall be moored by fastening the chains to the iron rings. The type of dock or apron shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Highways.

History.

4356za-21 to 4356za-23.